Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Cross references.

Georgia Building Authority (Markets), §

2-10-1

et seq.

Georgia Education Authority (Schools), §

20-2-550

et seq.

Georgia Education Authority (University), §

20-3-150

et seq.

Private Colleges and Universities Facilities Authority, §

20-3-200

et seq.

Georgia Building Authority (Hospital), § 31-7-20 et seq.

Georgia Building Authority (Penal), §

42-3-1

et seq.

Georgia Building Authority, §

50-9-1

et seq.